Washington statutes.
RCW 36.49.040

Delinquent tax, how collected.

If any person whose name appears upon the list prepared by the county assessor fails to pay the license tax to the county treasurer on or before the first day of August of the year in which the list is made, the county treasurer shall proceed to collect the delinquent license taxes in the manner provided by law for collection of delinquent personal property taxes.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.49.040. Prior: 1929 c 198 s 3, part; RRS s 8304-3, part.]